California statutes. Public Resources Code
(6) Restoration purposes or creation of new habitat areas.

(7) Nature study, mariculture, or similar resource-dependent activities.

(8) Minor fill for improving shoreline appearance or public access to the water.

(b) The design and location of new or expanded facilities shall, to the extent practicable, take advantage of existing water depths, water circulation, siltation patterns, and means available to reduce controllable sedimentation so as to diminish the need for future dredging.

(c) Dredging shall be planned, scheduled, and carried out to minimize disruption to fish and bird breeding and migrations, marine habitats, and water circulation. Bottom sediments or sediment elutriate shall be analyzed for toxicants prior to dredging or mining, and where water quality standards are met, dredge spoils may be deposited in open coastal water sites designated to minimize potential adverse impacts on marine organisms, or in confined coastal waters designated as fill sites by the master plan where the spoil can be isolated and contained, or in fill basins on upland sites. Dredge material shall not be transported from coastal waters into estuarine or fresh water areas for disposal.

(d) For water areas to be diked, filled, or dredged, the commission shall balance and consider socioeconomic and environmental factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

30706.

In addition to the other provisions of this chapter, the policies contained in this section shall govern filling seaward of the mean high tide line within the jurisdiction of ports:

(a) The water area to be filled shall be the minimum necessary to achieve the purpose of the fill.

(b) The nature, location, and extent of any fill, including the disposal of dredge spoils within an area designated for fill, shall minimize harmful effects to coastal resources, such as water quality, fish or wildlife resources, recreational resources, or sand transport systems, and shall minimize reductions of the volume, surface area, or circulation of water.

(c) The fill is constructed in accordance with sound safety standards which will afford reasonable protection to persons and property against the hazards of unstable geologic or soil conditions or of flood or storm waters.

(d) The fill is consistent with navigational safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30707.

New or expanded tanker terminals shall be designed and constructed to do all of the following:

(a) Minimize the total volume of oil spilled.

(b) Minimize the risk of collision from movement of other vessels.

(c) Have ready access to the most effective feasible oilspill containment and recovery equipment.

(d) Have onshore deballasting facilities to receive any fouled ballast water from tankers where operationally or legally required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30708.

All port-related developments shall be located, designed, and constructed so as to:

(a) Minimize substantial adverse environmental impacts.

(b) Minimize potential traffic conflicts between vessels.

(c) Give highest priority to the use of existing land space within harbors for port purposes, including, but not limited to, navigational facilities, shipping industries, and necessary support and access facilities.

(d) Provide for other beneficial uses consistent with the public trust, including, but not limited to, recreation and wildlife habitat uses, to the extent feasible.

(e) Encourage rail service to port areas and multicompany use of facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Implementation; Master Plan [30710. - 30721.]

30710.

Within 90 days after January 1, 1977, the commission shall, after public hearing, adopt, certify, and file with each port governing body a map delineating the present legal geographical boundaries of each port’s jurisdiction within the coastal zone. The commission shall, within such 90-day period, adopt and certify after public hearing, a map delineating boundaries of any wetland, estuary, or existing recreation area indicated in Part IV of the coastal plan within the geographical boundaries of each port.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30711.

(a) A port master plan that carries out the provisions of this chapter shall be prepared and adopted by each port governing body, and for informational purposes, each city, county, or city and county which has a port within its jurisdiction shall incorporate the certified port master plan in its local coastal program. A port master plan shall include all of the following:

(1) The proposed uses of land and water areas, where known.

(2) The projected design and location of port land areas, water areas, berthing, and navigation ways and systems intended to serve commercial traffic within the area of jurisdiction of the port governing body.

(3) An estimate of the effect of development on habitat areas and the marine environment, a review of existing water quality, habitat areas, and quantitative and qualitative biological inventories, and proposals to minimize and mitigate any substantial adverse impact.

(4) Proposed projects listed as appealable in Section 30715 in sufficient detail to be able to determine their consistency with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) of this division.

(5) Provisions for adequate public hearings and public participation in port planning and development decisions.

(b) A port master plan shall contain information in sufficient detail to allow the commission to determine its adequacy and conformity with the applicable policies of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30712.

In the consideration and approval of a proposed port master plan, the public, interested organizations, and governmental agencies shall be encouraged to submit relevant testimony, statements, and evidence which shall be considered by the port governing body. The port governing body shall publish notice of the completion of the draft master plan and submit a copy thereof to the commission and shall, upon request, provide copies to other interested persons, organizations, and governmental agencies. Thereafter, the port governing body shall hold a public hearing on the draft master plan not earlier than 30 days and not later than 90 days following the date the notice of completion was published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30714.

After public notice, hearing, and consideration of comments and testimony received pursuant to Section 30712, the port governing body shall adopt its master plan and submit it to the commission for certification in accordance with this chapter. Within 90 days after the submittal, the commission, after public hearing, shall certify the plan or portion of a plan and reject any portion of a plan that is not certified. The commission may not
 modify the plan as submitted as a condition of certification. If the commission rejects any portion of a plan, it shall base that rejection upon written findings of fact and conclusion of law. If the commission fails to take action within the 90-day period, the port master plan shall be deemed certified. The commission shall certify the plan, or portion of a plan, if the commission finds both of the following:

(a) The master plan, or certified portions of the master plan, conforms with and carries out the policies of this chapter.

(b) Where a master plan, or certified portions
 of a master plan, provide for any of the developments listed as appealable in Section 30715, the development or developments are in conformity with all of the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 10.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30715.

(a) Until such time as a port master plan or any portion thereof has been certified, the commission shall permit developments within ports as provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600). After a port master plan or any portion thereof has been certified, the permit authority of the commission provided in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall no longer be exercised by the commission over any new development contained in the certified plan or any portion thereof and shall at that time be delegated to the appropriate port governing body, except that approvals of any of the following categories of development by the port governing body may be appealed to the commission:

(1) Developments for the storage, transmission, and processing of liquefied natural gas and crude oil in such quantities as would have a significant impact upon the oil and gas supply of the state or nation or both the state and nation. A development which has a significant impact shall be defined in the master plans.

(2) Waste water treatment facilities, except for those facilities which process waste water discharged incidental to normal port activities or by vessels.

(3) Roads or highways which are not principally for internal circulation within the port boundaries.

(4) Office and residential buildings not principally devoted to the administration of activities within the port; hotels, motels, and shopping facilities not principally devoted to the sale of commercial goods utilized for water-oriented purposes; commercial fishing facilities; and recreational small craft marina related facilities.

(5) Oil refineries.

(6) Petrochemical production plants.

(b) If maintenance dredging is part of, or is associated with, any category of development specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the commission shall not consider that maintenance dredging in its review and approval of those categories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30715.5.

No development within the area covered by the certified port master plan shall be approved by the port governing body unless it finds that the proposed development conforms with such certified plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30716.

(a) A certified port master plan may be amended by the port governing body, but an amendment shall not take effect until it has been certified by the commission. Any proposed amendment shall be submitted to, and processed by, the commission in the same manner as provided for submission and certification of a port master plan.

(b) The commission shall, by regulation, establish a procedure whereby proposed amendments to a certified port master plan may be reviewed and designated by the executive director of the commission as being minor in nature and need not comply with Section 30714. These amendments shall take effect on the 10th working day after the executive director designates the amendments as minor.

(c) (1) The executive director may determine that a proposed certified port master plan amendment is de minimis if the executive director determines that the proposed amendment would have no impact, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources, is consistent with the policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200), and meets the following criteria:

(A) The port governing body, at least 21 days prior to the date of submitting the proposed amendment to the executive director, has provided public notice, and provided a copy to the commission, which specifies the dates and places where comments will be accepted on the proposed amendment, contains a brief description of the proposed amendment, and states the address where copies of the proposed amendment are available for public review, by one of the following procedures:

(i) Publication, not fewer times than required by Section 6061 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed amendment. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.

(ii) Posting of the notice by the port governing body both onsite and offsite in the area affected by the proposed amendment.

(iii) Direct mailing to the owners and occupants of contiguous property shown on the latest equalized assessment roll.

(B) The proposed amendment does not propose any change in land use or water uses or any change in the allowable use of property.

(2) At the time that the
 port governing body submits the proposed amendment to the executive director, the port governing body shall also submit to the executive director any public comments that were received during the comment period provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(3) (A) The executive director shall make a determination as to whether the proposed amendment is de minimis within 10 working days from the date of submittal by the local government. If the proposed amendment is determined to be de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be noticed in the agenda of the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission, in accordance with Section 11125 of the Government Code, and any public comments forwarded by the port governing body shall be made available to the members of the commission.

(B) If three members of the commission object to the executive director’s
 determination that the proposed amendment is de minimis, the proposed amendment shall be set for public hearing in accordance with the procedures specified in subdivision (a) or, at the request of the port governing body, returned to the port governing body. If set for public hearing under subdivision (a), the time requirements set by this section and Section 30714 shall commence from the date on which the objection to the de minimis designation was made.

(C) If three or more members of the commission do not object to the de minimis determination, the de minimis amendment shall become a part of the certified port master plan upon adjournment of the commission meeting on that date.

(4) The commission may, after a noticed public hearing, adopt guidelines to implement this subdivision, which shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law and from Chapter 3.5
 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commission shall file any guidelines adopted pursuant to this paragraph with the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 556, Sec. 2.   (AB 439)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30717.

The governing bodies of ports shall inform and advise the commission in the planning and design of appealable developments authorized under this chapter, and prior to commencement of any appealable development, the governing body of a port shall notify the commission and other interested persons, organizations, and governmental agencies of the approval of a proposed appealable development and indicate how it is consistent with the appropriate port master plan and this division. An approval of the appealable development by the port governing body pursuant to a certified port master plan shall become effective after the 10th working day after notification of its approval, unless an appeal is filed with the commission within that time. Appeals shall be filed and processed by the commission in the same manner as appeals from local government actions as set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) of this division. No appealable development shall take place until the approval becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30718.

For developments approved by the commission in a certified master plan, but not appealable under the provisions of this chapter, the port governing body shall forward all environmental impact reports and negative declarations prepared pursuant to the Environmental Quality Act of 1970 (commencing with Section 21000) or any environmental impact statements prepared pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321, et seq.) to the commission in a timely manner for comment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30719.

Any development project or activity authorized or approved pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed certified by the commission as being in conformity with the coastal zone management program insofar as any such certification is requested by any federal agency pursuant to the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451, et seq.), National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and memoranda of understanding between the state and federal governments relative thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30720.

If the application of any port master plan or part thereof is prohibited or stayed by any court, the permit authority provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be reinstated in the commission. The reinstated permit authority shall apply as to any development which would be affected by the prohibition or stay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

30721.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that Port Hueneme is unique in its relationship to the coast in that it is the only deep water port operated by a harbor district, and is without access to city or county funds. Therefore, the governing body of Port Hueneme may claim reimbursement of costs it incurs in the preparation and certification of a port master plan as required by this chapter.

(b) Prior to submitting any claim for reimbursement, the governing body of the port shall submit its proposed claims to the executive director of the commission for review and approval and shall provide adequate documentation to enable the executive director to make the following determinations:

(1) That the work done was directly attributable to the operation of this chapter.

(2) That the work done is reasonably related to, and appears to be necessary for, the preparation of a certifiable port master plan for the geographic area within the port’s jurisdiction as identified by the commission pursuant to Section 30710.

(3) That the governing body of a port is not reimbursed for the costs of the work from any other source.

The executive director of the commission shall, within 60 days after receipt of the necessary information, approve the proposed claim, if the director can make the determinations set forth in this subdivision.

(c) After a proposed claim has been reviewed and approved by the executive director of the commission pursuant to subdivision (b), the governing body of the port may submit its claim for reimbursement to the Controller who shall then process and pay any such claim as provided for in Section 2231 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 741.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Judicial Review, Enforcement, and Penalties [30800. - 30824.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [30800. - 30812.]

30800.

The provisions of this chapter shall be in addition to any other remedies available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30801.

(a) Any aggrieved person shall have a right to judicial review of any decision or action of the commission by filing a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, within 60 days after the decision or action has become final.

(b) For
 purposes of this section and subdivision (c) of Section 30513 and Section 30625, an “aggrieved person” means any person who, in person or through a representative, appeared at a public hearing of the commission, local government, or port governing body in connection with the decision or action appealed, or who, by other appropriate means before a hearing, informed the commission, local government, or port governing body of the nature of
 their concerns or who for good cause was unable to do either. “Aggrieved person” includes the applicant for a permit and, in the case of an approval of a local coastal program, the local government involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 21.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30802.

Any person, including an applicant for a permit or the commission, aggrieved by the decision or action of a local government that is implementing a certified local coastal program or certified port master plan, or is exercising its powers pursuant to Section 30600.5, which decision or action may not be appealed to the commission, shall have a right to judicial review of such decision or action by filing a petition for writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 60 days after the decision or action has become final. The commission may intervene in any such proceeding upon a showing that the matter involves a question of the conformity of a proposed development with a certified local coastal program or certified port master plan or the validity of a local government action taken to implement a local coastal program or certified port master plan. Any local government or port governing body may request that the commission intervene. Notice of this action against a local government or port governing body shall be filed with the commission within five working days of the filing of this action. When an action is brought challenging the validity of a local coastal program or certified port master plan, a preliminary showing shall be made prior to proceeding on the merits as to why such action should not have been brought pursuant to the provisions of Section 30801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

30803.

(a) Any person may maintain an action for declaratory and equitable relief to restrain any violation of this division, of a cease and desist order issued pursuant to Section 30809 or 30810, or of a restoration order issued pursuant to Section 30811. On a prima facie showing of a violation of this division, preliminary equitable relief shall be issued to restrain any further violation of this division. No bond shall be required for an action under this section.

(b) A court may stay the operation of the cease and desist order after it provides notice to the commission and holds a hearing. Any such stay may be imposed or continued only if it is not against the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30804.

Any person may maintain an action to enforce the duties specifically imposed upon the commission, any governmental agency, any special district, or any local government by this division. No bond shall be required for an action under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

30805.

Any person may maintain an action for the recovery of civil penalties provided for in Section 30820 or 30821.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30805.5.

Any action pursuant to Sections 30805 or 30822 to recover civil fines or penalties under this chapter shall be commenced not later than three years from the date on which the cause of action for the recovery is known or should have been known.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30806.

(a) Any civil action under this division by, or against, a city, county, or city and county, the commission, special district, or any other public agency shall, upon motion of either party, be transferred to a county or city and county not a party to the action or to a county or city and county other than that in which the city, special district, or any other public agency which is a party to the action is located. 

(b) In any action brought by or against any local government, other than an action brought by or against the commission, that involves the enforcement or implementation of its certified local coastal program, the Department of Justice shall, upon the request of the local government, provide such legal assistance as its resources permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

30808.

In addition to any other remedy provided by this article, any person, including the commission may bring an action to restrain a violation of the terms and conditions of an urban exclusion imposed pursuant to Section 30610.5. In any such action the court may grant whatever relief it deems appropriate to ensure compliance with the terms and conditions of the urban exclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

30809.

(a) If the executive director determines that any person or governmental agency has undertaken, or is threatening to undertake, any activity that (1) may require a permit from the commission without securing a permit or (2) may be inconsistent with any permit previously issued by the commission, the executive director may issue an order directing that person or governmental agency to cease and desist. The order may be also issued to enforce any requirements of a certified local coastal program or port master plan, or any requirements of this division which are subject to the jurisdiction of the certified program or plan, under any of the following circumstances: 

(1) The local government or port governing body requests the commission to assist with, or assume primary responsibility for, issuing a cease and desist order. 

(2) The commission requests and the local government or port governing body declines to act, or does not take action in a timely manner, regarding an alleged violation which could cause significant damage to coastal resources. 

(3) The local government or port governing body is a party to the violation. 

(b) The cease and desist order shall be issued only if the person or agency has failed to respond in a satisfactory manner to an oral notice given in person or by telephone, followed by a written confirmation, or a written notice given by certified mail or hand delivered to the landowner or the person performing the activity. The notice shall include the following: 

(1) A description of the activity which meets the criteria of subdivision (a). 

(2) A statement that the described activity constitutes development which is in violation of this division because it is not authorized by a valid coastal development permit. 

(3) A statement that the described activity be immediately stopped or the alleged violator may receive a cease and desist order, the violation of which may subject the violator to additional fines. 

(4) The name, address, and phone number of the commission or local government office which is to be contacted for further information. 

(c) The cease and desist order may be subject to such terms and conditions as the executive director may determine are necessary to avoid irreparable injury to any area within the jurisdiction of the commission pending action by the commission under Section 30810. 

(d) The cease and desist order shall be effective upon its issuance, and copies shall be served forthwith by certified mail upon the person or governmental agency subject to the order. 

(e) A cease and desist order issued pursuant to this section shall become null and void 90 days after issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 761, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30810.

(a) If the commission, after public hearing, determines that any person or governmental agency has undertaken, or is threatening to undertake, any activity that (1) requires a permit from the commission without securing a permit or (2) is inconsistent with any permit previously issued by the commission, the commission may issue an order directing that person or governmental agency to cease and desist. The order may also be issued to enforce any requirements of a certified local coastal program or port master plan, or any requirements of this division which are subject to the jurisdiction of the certified program or plan, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The local government or port governing body requests the commission to assist with, or assume primary responsibility for, issuing a cease and desist order.

(2) The commission requests and the local government or port governing body declines to act, or does not take action in a timely manner, regarding an alleged violation which could cause significant damage to coastal resources.

(3) The local government or port governing body is a party to the violation.

(b) The cease and desist order may be subject to such terms and conditions as the commission may determine are necessary to ensure compliance with this division, including immediate removal of any development or material or the setting of a schedule within which steps shall be taken to obtain a permit pursuant to this division. 

(c) Notice of the public hearing on a proposed cease and desist order shall be given to all affected persons and agencies and the order shall be final and effective upon the issuance of the order. Copies shall be served immediately by certified mail upon the person or governmental agency subject to the order and upon other affected persons and agencies who appeared at the hearing or requested a copy. The notice shall include a description of the civil remedy to a cease and desist order, authorized by Section 30803.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30811.

In addition to any other authority to order restoration, the commission, a local government that is implementing a certified local coastal program, or a port governing body that is implementing a certified port master plan may, after a public hearing, order restoration of a site if it finds that the development has occurred without a coastal development permit from the commission, local government, or port governing body, the development is inconsistent with this division, and the development is causing continuing resource damage.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 30826 by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30812.

(a) Whenever the executive director of the commission has determined, based on substantial evidence, that real property has been developed in violation of this division, the executive director may cause a notification of intention to record a notice of violation to be mailed by regular and certified mail to the owner of the real property at issue, describing the real property, identifying the nature of the violation, naming the owners thereof, and stating that if the owner objects to the filing of a notice of violation, an opportunity will be given to the owner to present evidence on the issue of whether a violation has occurred.

(b) The notification specified in subdivision (a) shall indicate that the owner is required to respond in writing, within 20 days of the postmarked mailing of the notification, to object to recording the notice of violation. The notification shall also state that if, within 20 days of mailing of the notification, the owner of the real property at issue fails to inform the executive director of the owner’s objection to recording the notice of violation, the executive director shall record the notice of violation in the office of each county recorder where all or part of the property is located.

(c) If the owner submits a timely objection to the proposed filing of the notice of violation, a public hearing shall be held at the next regularly scheduled commission meeting for which adequate public notice can be provided, at which the owner may present evidence to the commission why the notice of violation should not be recorded. The hearing may be postponed for cause for not more than 90 days after the date of the receipt of the objection to recordation of the notice of violation.

(d) If, after the commission has completed its hearing and the owner has been given the opportunity to present evidence, the commission finds that, based on substantial evidence, a violation has occurred, the executive director shall record the notice of violation in the office of each county recorder where all or part of the real property is located. If the commission finds that no violation has occurred, the executive director shall mail a clearance letter to the owner of the real property.

(e) (1) The notice of violation shall be contained in a separate document prominently entitled “Notice of Violation of the Coastal Act.” The notice of violation shall contain all of the following information:

(A) The names of the owners of record.

(B) A legal description of the real property affected by the notice.

(C) A statement specifically identifying the nature of the alleged violation.

(D) A commission file number relating to the notice.

(2) The notice of violation, when properly recorded and indexed, shall be considered notice of the violation to all successors in interest in that property. This notice is for informational purposes only and is not a defect, lien, or encumbrance on the property.

(f) Within 30 days after the final resolution of a violation that is the subject of a recorded notice of violation, the executive director shall mail a clearance letter to the owner of the real property and shall record a notice of recision in the office of each county recorder in which the notice of violation was filed, indicating that the notice of violation is no longer valid. The notice of recision shall have the same effect of a withdrawal or expungement under Section 405.61 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) The executive director may not invoke the procedures of this section until all existing administrative methods for resolving the violation have been utilized and the property owner has been made aware of the potential for the recordation of a notice of violation. For purposes of this subdivision, existing methods for resolving the violation do not include the commencement of an administrative or judicial proceeding.

(h) This section only applies in circumstances where the commission is the legally responsible coastal development permitting authority or where a local government or port governing body requests the commission to assist in the resolution of an unresolved violation if the local government is the legally responsible coastal development permitting authority.

(i) The commission, 24 months from the date of recordation, shall review each notice of violation that has been recorded to determine why the violation has not been resolved and whether the notice of violation should be expunged.

(j) The commission, at any time and for cause, on its own initiative or at the request of the property owner, may cause a notice of recision to be recorded invalidating the notice of violation recorded pursuant to this section. The notice of recision shall have the same effect of a withdrawal or expungement under Section 405.61 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 252.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Penalties [30820. - 30824.]

30820.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this division may be civilly liable in accordance with this subdivision as follows:

(1) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with this article on any person who performs or undertakes development that is in violation of this division or that is inconsistent with any coastal development permit previously issued by the commission, a local government that is implementing a certified local coastal program, or a port governing body that is implementing a certified port master plan, in an amount that shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) and shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(2) Civil liability may be imposed for any violation of this division other than that specified in paragraph (1) in an amount that shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(b) Any person who performs or undertakes development that is in violation of this division or that is inconsistent with any coastal development permit previously issued by the commission, a local government that is implementing a certified local coastal program, or a port governing body that is implementing a certified port master plan, when the person intentionally and knowingly performs or undertakes the development in violation of this division or inconsistent with any previously issued coastal development permit, may, in addition to any other penalties, be civilly liable in accordance with this subdivision. Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with this article for a violation as specified in this subdivision in an amount which shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), per day for each day in which the violation persists.

(c) In determining the amount of civil liability, the following factors shall be considered:

(1) The nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation.

(2) Whether the violation is susceptible to restoration or other remedial measures.

(3) The sensitivity of the resource affected by the violation.

(4) The cost to the state of bringing the action.

(5) With respect to the violator, any voluntary restoration or remedial measures undertaken, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic profits, if any, resulting from, or expected to result as a consequence of, the violation, and such other matters as justice may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1199, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30821.

(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed pursuant to this division, a person, including a landowner, who is in violation of the public access provisions of this division is subject to an administrative civil penalty that may be imposed by the commission in an amount not to exceed 75 percent of the amount of the maximum penalty authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30820 for each violation. The administrative civil penalty may be assessed for each day the violation persists, but for no more than five years.

(b) All penalties imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be imposed by majority vote of the commissioners present in a duly noticed public hearing in compliance with the requirements of Section 30810, 30811, or 30812.

(c) In determining the amount of civil liability, the commission shall take into account the factors set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 30820.
